District of Columbia statutes.
25-204

Board — Functions and duties.

All duties and responsibilities in respect to the regulation of alcoholic beverage control establishments that previously have been given to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs, established by Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1983, shall be assumed by the Board.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) provisions, see § 3 of Mt. Pleasant, Targeted Ward 2, and Targeted Ward 6 Single Sales Moratorium Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-564, October 27, 2008, 55 DCR 12024).

Editor's Notes

Section 3 of D.C. Law 17-287 provided: “Sec. 3. Subsidies for officers. As of July 28, 2008, the Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Administration shall provide subsidies for officers that participate in the Pilot Subsidy Program for Reimbursable Details, in entertainment areas during late night closing times and approved special events. Receipts for weekend nights prior to July 28, 2008 shall be considered under the law in place prior July 28, 2008.”